Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Chapter 48. Personal Information Protection Act.

Effective dates. —

Section 10, ch. 92, SLA 2008 makes AS

45.48.010

—

45.48.460

,

45.48.480

, and AS

45.48.500

—

45.48.995

effective July 1, 2009.
Section 8, ch. 92, SLA 2008 makes AS

45.48.470

effective June 14, 2008, in accordance with AS

01.10.070(c)

.